Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201467-2,100
Existing conversion; effect.

Any conversion
of a limited partnership to a limited liability company filed with the Secretary
of State's office and existing on or before July 19, 2012, shall
continue to be valid.

Laws 2012, LB1018, § 13.